Illinois, session 104th, SB681.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 14-104.10 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/14-104.10)7    Sec. 14-104.10. Federal or out-of-state employment. A 8contributing employee may establish additional service credit 9for periods of full-time employment by the the federal 10government or a unit of state or local government located 11outside Illinois for which he or she does not qualify for 12credit under any other provision of this Article, provided 13that (i) the amount of service credit established by a person 14under this Section shall not exceed 8 years or 40% of his or 15her membership service under this Article, whichever is less, 16(ii) the amount of service credit established by a person 17under this Section for federal employment, when added to the 18amount of all military service credit granted to the person 19under this Article, shall not exceed 8 years, and (iii) any 20credit received for the federal or out-of-state employment in 21any federal or other public employee pension fund or 22retirement system has been terminated or relinquished. Credit 23may not be established under this Section for any period of   SB0681- 2 -LRB104 06988 RPS 17025 b1military service or for any period for which credit has been or 2may be established under Section 14-110 or any other provision 3of this Article.4    In order to establish service credit under this Section, 5the applicant must submit a written application to the System 6by June 30, 1999, including documentation of the federal or 7out-of-state employment satisfactory to the Board, and pay to 8the System (1) employee contributions at the rates provided in 9this Article based upon the person's salary on the last day as 10a participating employee prior to the federal or out-of-state 11employment, or on the first day as a participating employee 12after that employment, whichever is greater, plus (2) an 13amount determined by the Board to be equal to the employer's 14normal cost of the benefits accrued for that employment, plus 15(3) regular interest on items (1) and (2) from the date of 16conclusion of the employment to the date of payment.17(Source: P.A. 90-32, eff. 6-27-97; 90-655, eff. 7-30-98; 1890-766, eff. 8-14-98.)